Illinois, session 104th, HB4793.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Pharmacy Practice Act is amended by adding 5Section 20.5 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 85/20.5 new)7    Sec. 20.5. Non-pharmaceutical devices and durable medical 8equipment. A pharmacist who is exercising his or her 9professional judgment may add missing ancillary 10non-pharmaceutical devices or durable medical equipment that 11aid in the appropriate clinical usage of a medication or in 12achieving a positive therapeutic outcome to a prescription. 13Any changes to the prescription shall be documented in the 14patient's record.